Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 4A Indemnification of Public School Teachers and Employees

Cross references.

Plan for public school teachers, §

20-2-880

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Article 5A as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 3, was redesignated as Article 4A.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 3, provides that this article became effective July 1, 2001, only upon ratification of a constitutional amendment by the voters at the November 2000 general election. The constitutional amendment (Ga. L. 2000, p. 2001) was approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting at the general election held on November 7, 2000.

45-9-70.
Purpose of article.

The purpose of this article is to provide by law for the indemnification with respect to the death or permanent disability of public school teachers and public school employees who are killed or permanently disabled by an act of violence in the line of duty on or after July 1, 2001.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-100, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-70.

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 enactment of this article, see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 270 (2000).

45-9-71.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Act of violence” means a willful act of violence committed by a person other than a fellow public school teacher or public school employee.

“Commission” means the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Commission.

“In the line of duty” means while on duty and performing services for and receiving compensation from the public school district which employs such public school teacher or public school employee.

“Permanent disability” means disability due to:

Loss of both eyes or blindness in both eyes with only light perception;

Loss or loss of use of both hands;

Loss or loss of use of both legs;

Loss of a lower extremity or residuals of organic disease or injury which so affect the functions of balance or propulsion as to preclude locomotion without resort to a wheelchair; or

Organic brain damage resulting from direct physical trauma incurred after July 1, 2001, which so affects the mental capacity as to preclude ability to function productively in any employment.

“Public school employee” has the meaning provided by Code Section 20-2-910.

“Public school teacher” has the meaning provided by Code Section 20-2-880.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-101, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-71.

45-9-72.
Establishment of indemnification program.

There is established a program to provide for indemnification with respect to the death or permanent disability of any public school teacher or public school employee who is killed or permanently disabled by an act of violence in the line of duty on or after July 1, 2001.

Such program shall be administered by the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-102, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-72.

45-9-73.
Indemnification commission created; composition; assignment to Department of Administrative Services for administrative purposes.

There is created the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Commission which shall be composed of the Governor, the State School Superintendent, the Secretary of State, the Commissioner of Insurance, the chairperson of the State Board of Education, the commissioner of public health, and one public school teacher and one public school employee to be appointed by the Governor and serve at the pleasure thereof. The Governor shall be the chairperson of the commission and the commission shall be assigned to the Department of Administrative Services for administrative purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-103, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-73.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

45-9-74.
Commission to promulgate rules and regulations; use of personnel and resources of other agencies.

The commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations relative to the program of indemnification. Such rules and regulations may provide for initial investigation of claims and the issuance of subpoenas to facilitate such investigation, special masters, hearings, procedures for applications for indemnification, and all other matters so as to enable the commission to carry out its duties fairly, properly, and equitably. The chairperson of the commission shall be authorized to contact other state agencies for the purpose of using the personnel and resources of such agencies to assist the commission in carrying out its duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-104, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-74.

45-9-75.
Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund — Creation; general provisions.

There is created a fund to be known as the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund. The custodian of the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund shall be the Department of Administrative Services. The Department of Administrative Services shall administer the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund and may invest the resources of the fund in the same manner and fashion that an insurer authorized to issue contracts of life insurance is authorized to invest its resources. The Department of Administrative Services shall be further authorized to intermingle the resources of the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund with the resources of any other funds or accounts which have similar restrictions on the investments which may be made with such funds; provided, however, that separate bookkeeping accounts on each such fund shall be maintained.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-105, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-75.

45-9-76.
Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund — Revenues from sale of license plates; funds from other sources.

The Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund shall consist of revenues derived from the sale of special and distinctive motor vehicle license plates honoring Georgia educators issued prior to June 30, 2010 as provided by paragraph (7) of subsection (l) of Code Section 40-2-86. In addition, the Department of Administrative Services is authorized to accept for deposit in the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund any other funds from any other source. All revenue or other funds received by the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund shall not lapse.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-84/HB 1055.

45-9-77.
Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund — Authority of Department of Administrative Services.

The Department of Administrative Services is authorized, subject to the limitations contained in this article:

To pay the appropriate indemnification to the persons eligible for indemnification under this article or to the estate of such persons as provided in this article from the proceeds of the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund;

To make such payments as may be necessary to defray the expenses and costs incurred by the commission in administering this article; and

With the approval of the commission, to utilize the resources of the Georgia Public School Personnel Indemnification Fund to purchase insurance to provide for such indemnification.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-107, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-77.

45-9-78.
Payment of indemnification for death or disability generally; designation of method of payment; procedure for making payments.

The indemnification shall be paid by the commission when a public school teacher or public school employee who in the line of duty:

Is killed or receives bodily injury which results in death within 12 months thereafter, if such death occurs from an act of violence and if such death is not the result of suicide and if such bodily injury is not intentionally self-inflicted; or

Is permanently disabled, if the permanent disability occurs from an act of violence and if the permanent disability is not intentionally self-inflicted.

For any compensable claim filed under this article, payment shall be made as follows:

In the case of permanent disability, the eligible disabled person pursuant to this article may elect payment of $75,000.00 in equal installments over a period of five years or a payment in lump sum which shall consist of $75,000.00 reduced to its present value upon the basis of interest calculated at the rate of 6 percent per annum; and

In the case of death, payment shall be made to the estate of a person who is eligible for indemnification under this article as follows: the executor or administrator may elect payment of $75,000.00 in equal installments over a period of five years or a payment in lump sum which shall consist of $75,000.00 reduced to its present value upon the basis of interest calculated at the rate of 6 percent per annum.

After determining that a public school teacher or public school employee has been killed or permanently disabled by an act of violence in the line of duty and that he or she or his or her estate beneficiary is entitled to indemnification under this article, the commission, within ten days after the end of the fiscal year in which such claim was filed and subject to the provisions of Code Section 45-9-79, shall forward a certified copy of the order granting such payment, which order shall include the person to whom such payment shall be made and the method of payment, to the commissioner of administrative services who is authorized to make the appropriate payments from funds made available for the purpose of carrying out this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-108, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-78.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “Code Section 45-9-79” was substituted for “Code Section 45-9-109” in subsection (c).

45-9-79.
Insufficient funds; procedure for making payments.

If the moneys provided by this article are not sufficient at any time to enable the commission to pay each person his or her benefits in full under this article, then those persons entitled to benefits whose claims were filed in the same fiscal year shall be paid an equal amount, if any, which, in the opinion of the commission, the fund may provide. In no such event shall the state or commission or any member of the commission be liable to any person for any deficiencies in payments under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-79

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-109, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-79.

45-9-79.1.
Application for indemnification.

An application for indemnification with respect to a claim filed under this article for permanent disability of a public school teacher or public school employee shall be submitted by that person unless the person is mentally incompetent, in which case the application may be made on such person’s behalf by the parent, spouse, guardian, or other authorized individual. An application for indemnification with respect to a claim filed under this article for the death of a public school teacher or public school employee shall be submitted by the individual authorized to administer the estate.

An application for indemnification with respect to the death or permanent disability of a public school teacher or public school employee who is killed or permanently disabled by an act of violence in the line of duty on or after July 1, 2001, must be made within 24 months after the date of the death or disability.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-79.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-109.1, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-79.1.

45-9-79.2.
Indemnification not taxable.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that indemnification paid pursuant to this article shall not be taxable within this state for any purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-79.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-109.2, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-79.2.

45-9-79.3.
Indemnification not to be awarded when penal violation caused or contributed to death or disability.

No indemnification shall be awarded to any person otherwise entitled thereto who violates a penal law of this state if such violation caused or contributed to the death or disability of the person.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-79.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-109.3, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-79.3.

45-9-79.4.
Annual report to General Assembly.

The commission shall annually file a report of its activities with the General Assembly, which report shall include the amount of funds paid under the program of indemnification. It shall also include a copy of each order providing for payment or a summary of each such order giving all pertinent details.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-79.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-109.4, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-79.4.

45-9-79.5.
Giving false information or testimony; liability to state.

Any person who shall knowingly give false information or false testimony causing or intended to cause the payment of indemnification which would not otherwise be justified under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any such person convicted under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be liable to the state for any funds paid as a result of such false information or testimony.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-9-79.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2.

Cross references.

Perjury, §

16-10-70

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 45-9-109.5, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 768, § 2, was redesignated as Code Section 45-9-79.5.